Oklahoma, session 2026, SB950.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 37A O.S. 2021, Section 3-118, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3-118. No alcoholic beverages intended for off-premise
off-premises or on-premise on-premises consumption shall be sold at
retail for less than a six percent (6%) markup, unless the sale
meets one or more of the following conditions:
1. Where seasonable merchandise is sold in bona fide clearance
sales, if advertised, marked and sold as such;
2. Where merchandise is imperfect or damaged or is being
discontinued and is advertised, marked and sold as such;
3. Where merchandise is sold upon the final liquidation of any
business;
4. Where merchandise is sold for charitable purposes or to
relief agencies;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB950 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

5. Where merchandise is sold on contract to departments of the
government or governmental institutions;
6. Where merchandise is sold by any officer acting under the
order or direction of any court; or
7. Where merchandise is sold at any bona fide auction sale.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 37A O.S. 2021, Section 3-123, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 94, O.S.L. 2023 (37A O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 3-123), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3-123. A. It shall be unlawful for any person
privileged to sell alcoholic beverages to wholesalers, beer
distributors or retailers:
1. To discriminate, directly or indirectly, in price between
one wine and spirits wholesaler and another wine and spirits
wholesaler, when that manufacturer has not designated a single wine
and spirits wholesaler, or between one retailer and another retailer
purchasing alcoholic beverages bearing the same brand or trade name
and of like age and quality, unless otherwise provided by law; or
2. To grant, directly or indirectly, any discount, rebate, free
goods, allowance or other inducement.
B. The ABLE Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement (ABLE)
Commission is hereby authorized to promulgate rules which are
necessary to carry out the purpose of this section and to prevent
its circumvention by the offering or giving of any rebate,
allowance, free goods, discount or any other thing or service of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB950 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

valu e; provided, the posting or invoicing of charges per order for
processing minimum orders or per case for the handling or repacking
of goods by wine and spirits wholesalers and beer distributors for
sales in less than full case lots shall not constitute a violation
of this section.
C. For the violation of any provision of this section or of any
rule duly promulgated under this section, the ABLE Commission may
issue a written warning, issue a fine, or suspend or revoke a
license as follows:
1. For a first offense, a written warning which may be
accompanied by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00);
2. For a second offense, not exceeding ten (10) days’
suspension of license; and
3. For a third offense, the ABLE Commission shall revoke the
license.
Provided, however, prior to suspending or revoking a license,
the ABLE Commission shall first provide written notice to a licensee
of the violation and a period of ninety (90) days following such
notice to cure or remedy such violation. For purposes of this
section, a “second offense” and “third offense” shall mean
violations that are related to or arising out of and occurring
within twelve (12) months of the “first offense” first offense.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB950 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. For purposes of this section, and except as otherwise
provided in subsection E of this section, “inducement” means
directly or indirectly offering, selling, trading, giving or
furnishing any discount, free goods, electronic or nonelectronic
refrigerated equipment, barrels, tubs, fixtures, dispensing
equipment, outdoor electric or nonelectric advertising structure
displaying the retailer’s name, permanent shelving, supplies, gifts,
prizes, instantly redeemable coupons, premiums, retailer rebates,
services of any employee including, but not limited to, affixing
price labels or tags, routinely stocking product on shelves other
than the stocking of cold boxes, paying a third party for entering
product and price information into a retailer’s computer system,
portal, website, spreadsheet or third-party system, handling product
that was not sold to the retailer by the licensee, paying a slotting
fee, selling on consignment, operating a retailer’s cash register,
conducting janitorial services, providing decorations, samples of
alcoholic beverages, personal property or other inducement or thing
of value to any retail spirit, retail beer, retail wine, beer and
wine, mixed beverage, caterer, bottle club or special event
licensee, wine and spirits wholesaler or beer distributor, their
agents or employees.
E. It shall not be deemed an inducement for a brewer, beer
distributor, small brewer self-distributor or brewpub self-

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB950 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

dist ributor to voluntarily take the following merchandising actions
with the permission of the retail licensee:
1. Furnish point-of-sale point of sale advertising materials
and consumer advertising specialties, as those terms are defined in
27 C.F.R., Section 6.84 and in compliance with the other limits and
restrictions provided in 27 C.F.R., Section 6.84;
2. Give or sell product displays, including, but not limited
to, barrels and tubs, provided that the value of such displays does
not exceed the limits and restrictions provided in 27 C.F.R.,
Section 6.83;
3. Build product displays, accessible to the customer for the
product being delivered by the beer distributor;
4. Affix pricing to the shelf strip or product display for the
product being delivered by the beer distributor, small brewer self-
distributor or brewpub self-distributor, or brewed by the brewer;
5. Routinely stock and restock shelves and cold boxes and
rotate product that has been sold to the retail licensee by the beer
distributor, small brewer self-distributor or brewpub self-
distributor, or brewed by the brewer;
6. Periodically perform product resets, with permission of the
retail licensee, pursuant to a provided shelf plan or shelf
schematic;
7. Furnish things of value to a temporary retailer, as defined
in 27 C.F.R., Section 6.85;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB950 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

8. Sell equipment or supplies to a retail licensee, provided
the equipment or supplies are sold at a price not less than the cost
to the industry member and payment is collected within thirty (30)
days of the sale;
9. Install dispensing accessories at the retail location, as
long as the retailer bears the cost of installation including
equipment; or furnish, give or sell coil cleaning services to a
retailer;
10. Withdraw quantities of beer or cider in undamaged, original
packaging from the retail licensee’s stock, provided the beer
distributor, small brewer self-distributor, brewpub self-distributor
or brewer sold such beer, directly or indirectly, to the retail
licensee and such removal is otherwise permitted under Section 3-115
of this title; provided, however, replacing with beer or cider of
equivalent value shall not be considered a consignment sale;
11. Provide mail-in rebates for beer, cider and nonalcoholic
beverage merchandise items, funded by the brewer and redeemed by the
brewer, either by itself or through a third-party fulfillment
company, for a discount or rebate on the beer, cider or nonalcoholic
item;
12. Provide a recommended shelf plan or shelf schematic to a
retail licensee for all or any portion of the inventory sold by the
retail licensee;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB950 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

13. Furnish or give a sample of beer or cider to a retailer who
has not purchased the brand from that brewer, beer distributor,
small brewer self-distributor or brewpub self-distributor within the
last twelve (12) months, provided that the brewer, beer distributor,
small brewer self-distributor or brewpub self-distributor may not
give more than thirty-six (36) ounces of any brand of beer or cider
to a specific retailer;
14. Furnish or give newspaper cuts, mats or engraved blocks for
use in retailers’ advertisements;
15. Package and distribute beer or cider in combination with
other nonalcoholic items for sale to consumers;
16. Give or sponsor educational seminars for employees of
retailers either at the brewer, beer distributor, small brewer self-
distributor or brewpub self-distributor’s premises or at the
retailer’s establishment, including seminars dealing with use of a
retailer’s equipment, training seminars for employees of retailers
or tours of the brewer, beer distributor, small brewer self-
distributor, or brewpub self-distributor’s plant premises, provided
that the brewer, beer distributor, small brewer self-distributor or
brewpub self-distributor shall not pay the retailer for the
employees’ travel, lodging or other expenses in conjunction with an
educational seminar but may provide nominal hospitality during the
event;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB950 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

17. Conduct tasting or sampling activities at a retail
establishment and purchase the products to be used from the retailer
so long as the purchase price paid does not exceed the ordinary
retail price; provided, a beer distributor shall not be required to
provide labor for such sampling activities;
18. Offer contest prizes, premium offers, refunds and like
items directly to consumers so long as officers, employees and
representatives of brewers, beer distributors, small brewer self-
distributors, brewpub self-distributors and licensed retailers are
excluded from participation;
19. List the names and addresses of two or more unaffiliated
retailers selling the products of a brewer, beer distributor, small
brewer, small brewer self-distributor or brewpub self-distributor in
an advertisement of such brewer, beer distributor, small brewer,
small brewer self-distributor or brewpub self-distributor so long as
the requirements of 27 C.F.R., Section 6.98 are satisfied,
considering applicable guidance issued by the United States
Department of the Treasury Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau;
provided, nothing in the Oklahoma Alcoholic Beverage Control Act
shall prohibit a retail, mixed beverage, on-premises beer and wine,
public event, special event, charitable auction, charitable
alcoholic beverage event, or complimentary beverage licensee from
communicating with a brewer, beer distributor, small brewer, small
brewer self-distributor or brewpub self-distributor on social media
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB950 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

or s haring media on the social media page or site of a brewer, beer
distributor, small brewer, small brewer self-distributor or brewpub
self-distributor. A retail, mixed beverage, on-premises beer and
wine, public event, special event, charitable auction, charitable
alcoholic beverage event, or complimentary beverage licensee may
request free social media advertising from a brewer, beer
distributor, small brewer, small brewer self-distributor or brewpub
self-distributor; provided, nothing in this section shall prohibit a
brewer, beer distributor, small brewer, small brewer self-
distributor or brewpub self-distributor from sharing, reposting or
forwarding a social media post by a retail, mixed beverage, on-
premises beer and wine, public event, special event, charitable
auction, charitable alcoholic beverage event, or complimentary
beverage licensee, as long as the sharing, reposting or forwarding
of the social media post does not contain the retail price of any
alcoholic beverage. No brewer, beer distributor, small brewer,
small brewer self-distributor or brewpub self-distributor shall pay
or reimburse a retail, mixed beverage, on-premises beer and wine,
public event, special event, charitable auction, charitable
alcoholic beverage event, or complimentary beverage licensee,
directly or indirectly, for any social media advertising services.
No retail, mixed beverage, on-premises beer and wine, public event,
special event, charitable auction, charitable alcoholic beverage
event, or complimentary beverage licensee shall accept any payment
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB950 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

or r eimbursement, directly or indirectly, for any social media
advertising service offered by a brewer, beer distributor, small
brewer, small brewer self-distributor or brewpub self-distributor.
For purposes of this paragraph, “social media” means a service,
platform or site where users communicate with one another and share
media, such as pictures, videos, music and blogs, with other users
free of charge; or
20. Entering product and price information into a retailer’s
portal, website, spreadsheet or third-party system. A brewer may
pay for a third-party system that provides data and pricing services
to the brewer or a beer distributor.
F. It shall not be deemed an inducement for a brewer, beer
distributor, small brewer self-distributor or brewpub self-
distributor to engage in the following marketing activities,
provided that the brewer, beer distributor, small brewer self-
distributor or brewpub self-distributor shall not pay the retailer’s
travel costs other than those for local transportation or lodging:
1. Provide tickets to a retailer for a sporting or
entertainment event so long as a representative of the brewer, beer
distributor, small brewer self-distributor or brewpub self-
distributor attends the event with the retailer;
2. Provide food and beverage to a retailer for immediate
consumption:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB950 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. at a meeting at which the primary purpose is the
discussion of business,
b. at a convention when the food and beverages are
offered to all participants, or
c. at a sports or entertainment event that the
representatives of a brewer, beer distributor, small
brewer self-distributor or brewpub self-distributor
attend with the retailer;
3. Participate in retailer association activities by engaging
in the following actions:
a. displaying products at a convention or trade show,
b. renting display booth space if the rental fee is the
same as paid by all exhibitors at the event,
c. providing its own hospitality which is independent
from association-sponsored activities,
d. purchasing tickets to functions and paying
registration fees if the payments or fees are the same
as paid by all attendees, participants or exhibitors
at the event, or
e. making payments for advertisements in programs or
brochures issued by retailer associations at a
convention or trade show; or
4. Giving or selling outdoor signs to a retailer so long as the
following requirements of 27 C.F.R., Section 6.102 are satisfied:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB950 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. the sign bears conspicuous and substantial advertising
matter about the product or the brewer, beer
distributor, small brewer self-distributor or brewpub
self-distributor which is permanently inscribed or
securely affixed,
b. the retailer is not compensated, directly or
indirectly, such as through a sign company, for
displaying the signs, and
c. a permanent outdoor sign does not contain the
retailer’s name.
G. It shall not be deemed an inducement or a discriminatory
action for a brewer, beer distributor, small brewer self-
distributor, brewpub self-distributor, or a wine and spirits
wholesaler to establish individualized servicing and delivery
schedules, including minimum order guidelines, for its retailers
based on each retailer’s actual needs, including, without
limitation, on the basis of the retailer’s sales volume.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
March 6, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS





SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB950 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)